src-fst-stems-numerals.lexc.md
# Finnish Numerals







Numerals have been split in three sections, the compounding parts
of cardinals and ordinals, and the non-compounding ones:

*Numeral examples:*
* *kaksikymmentäkolmetuhatta:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom#kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Par#kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Nom#tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Par` (Eng. # 23,000)
* *kahdessadasneljäs:* `kahdes+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom#sadas+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom#neljäs+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # 204rd)
* *viitisenkymmentä:* `viitisen+Num#kymmentä` (Eng. # 50-ish)

The compounding parts of cardinals are the number multiplier words.

*cardinal examples:*
* *yksi:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # one)
* *viidelle:* `viisi+Num+Card+Sg+All` (Eng. # five)
* *tuhatta:* `tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Par` (Eng. # thousand)

The suffixes only appear after cardinal multipliers

*Cardinal multiplicants examples:*
* *viisikymmentä:* `viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom#kymmentä`
* *neljäsataatuhatta:* `neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Nom#sata+Num+Card+Sg+Par#tuhatta`

The compounding parts of ordinals are the number multiplier words.

*Ordinal numerals examples:*
* *neljäs:* `neljäs+A+Ord+Sg+Nom`
* *viidennelle:* `viides+A+Ord+Sg+All`
* *tuhannetta:* `tuhannes+A+Ord+Sg+Par`

The suffixes only appear after cardinal multipliers

*Ordinal multiplicants examples:*
* *viideskymmenes:* `viides+A+Ord+Sg+Nom#kymmenes`
* *neljässadastuhannes:* `neljäs+A+Ord+Sg+Nom#sadas+A+Ord+Sg+Nom#tuhannes`

There is a set of numbers or corresponding expressions that work like them,
but are not basic cardinals or ordinals:

*Numeral others examples:*
* *viitisenkymmentä:* `viitisen+Num#kymmentä`
* *puolikymmentä:* `puolikymmentä+Num+Sg+Nom`

## Numeral stem variation
Numerals follow the same stem variation patterns as nouns, some of these
being very rare to extinct for nouns. 

*Numerals 31 examples:*
* *yksi:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *yhteen:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`
* *yhtenä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *yhdessä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *yhtä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *yksiä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Par`
* *yksien:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *yksiin:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`
* *yksinä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *yksissä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`


*Numerals 31 back§ examples:*
* *kaksi:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *kahteen:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`
* *kahtena:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *kahdessa:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *kahta:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *kaksia:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Par`
* *kaksien:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *kaksiin:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`
* *kaksina:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *kaksissa:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`


*Numerals 8~5 examples:*
* *kolme:* `kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *kolmeen:* `kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`
* *kolmena:* `kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *kolmessa:* `kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *kolmea:* `kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *kolmia:* `kolme+Num+Card+Pl+Par`
* *kolmien:* `kolme+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *kolmiin:* `kolme+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`
* *kolmina:* `kolme+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *kolmissa:* `kolme+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`


*Numerals 10 examples:*
* *neljä:* `neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *neljää:* `neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *neljään:* `neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`
* *neljänä:* `neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *neljässä:* `neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *neljiä:* `neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Par`
* *neljien:* `neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *neljiin:* `neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`
* *neljinä:* `neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *neljissä:* `neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`
* *neljäin:* `neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare`


*Numerals 27 front examples:*
* *viisi:* `viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *viiteen:* `viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`
* *viitenä:* `viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *viidessä:* `viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *viisinä:* `viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *viisissä:* `viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`
* *viittä:* `viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *viitten:* `viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *viisiä:* `viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Par`
* *viisien:* `viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *viisiin:* `viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`


*Numerals 27 back examples:*
* *kuusi:* `kuusi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *kuutena:* `kuusi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *kuudessa:* `kuusi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *kuusina:* `kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *kuusissa:* `kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`
* *kuutta:* `kuusi+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *kuutten:* `kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *kuusia:* `kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Par`
* *kuusien:* `kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *kuusiin:* `kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`



*Numerals 10n examples:*
* *kahdeksan:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *kahdeksaa:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *kahdeksaan:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`
* *kahdeksassa:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *kahdeksana:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *kahdeksia:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Pl+Par`
* *kahdeksien:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *kahdeksiin:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`
* *kahdeksissa:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`
* *kahdeksina:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *kahdeksain:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare`


*Numerals 10n front examples:*
* *yhdeksän:* `yhdeksän+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *yhdeksää:* `yhdeksän+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *yhdeksään:* `yhdeksän+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`
* *yhdeksässä:* `yhdeksän+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *yhdeksänä:* `yhdeksän+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *yhdeksiä:* `yhdeksän+Num+Card+Pl+Par`
* *yhdeksien:* `yhdeksän+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *yhdeksissä:* `yhdeksän+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`
* *yhdeksinä:* `yhdeksän+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *yhdeksäin:* `yhdeksän+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare`


*Numerals 32 examples:*
* *kymmenen:* `kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *kymmeneen:* `kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`
* *kymmenenä:* `kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *kymmenessä:* `kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *kymmentä:* `kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *kymmenten:* `kymmenen+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *kymmenien:* `kymmenen+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *kymmeniin:* `kymmenen+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`
* *kymmenissä:* `kymmenen+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`
* *kymmeninä:* `kymmenen+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`


*Numerals 9 examples:*
* *sata:* `sata+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *satana:* `sata+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *sadassa:* `sata+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *sataan:* `sata+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`
* *sataa:* `sata+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *satojen:* `sata+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *satoihin:* `sata+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`
* *sadoissa:* `sata+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`
* *satoina:* `sata+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`


*Numerals 46 examples:*
* *tuhat:* `tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *tuhanteen:* `tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`
* *tuhantena:* `tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *tuhannessa:* `tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *tuhansien:* `tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *tuhatta:* `tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *tuhansia:* `tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Par`
* *tuhansien:* `tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *tuhansiin:* `tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`
* *tuhansina:* `tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *tuhansissa:* `tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`


*Numerals 10 examples:*
* *miljoona:* `miljoona+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *miljoonana:* `miljoona+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *miljoonassa:* `miljoona+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *miljoonaa:* `miljoona+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *miljoonaan:* `miljoona+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`
* *miljoonia:* `miljoona+Num+Card+Pl+Par`
* *miljoonien:* `miljoona+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *miljooniin:* `miljoona+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`
* *miljoonissa:* `miljoona+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`
* *miljoonina:* `miljoona+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`



*Numerals 5 examples:*
* *miljardi:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *miljardina:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *miljardissa:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *miljardeina:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *miljardeissa:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`
* *miljardia:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *miljardiin:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`
* *miljardeja:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Pl+Par`
* *miljardien:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *miljardeihin:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`



*Numerals 5 more examples:*
* *Googol:* `Googol+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`


*Numerals 5 moremore examples:*
* *pari:* `pari+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *parina:* `pari+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`
* *parissa:* `pari+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *pareissa:* `pari+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`
* *pareina:* `pari+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *paria:* `pari+Num+Card+Sg+Par`
* *pareja:* `pari+Num+Card+Pl+Par`
* *parien:* `pari+Num+Card+Pl+Gen`
* *pareihin:* `pari+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`
* *pariin:* `pari+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`



*Numerals 38 examples:*
* *ensimmäinen:* `ensimmäinen+A+Ord+Sg+Nom`
* *ensimmäisenä:* `ensimmäinen+A+Ord+Sg+Ess`
* *ensimmäisessä:* `ensimmäinen+A+Ord+Sg+Ine`
* *ensimmäistä:* `ensimmäinen+A+Ord+Sg+Par`
* *ensimmäisten:* `ensimmäinen+A+Ord+Pl+Gen`
* *ensimmäisiä:* `ensimmäinen+A+Ord+Pl+Par`
* *ensimmäisiin:* `ensimmäinen+A+Ord+Pl+Ill`
* *ensimmäisinä:* `ensimmäinen+A+Ord+Pl+Ess`
* *ensimmäisissä:* `ensimmäinen+A+Ord+Pl+Ine`


*Numerals 38 back examples:*
* *toinen:* `toinen+A+Ord+Sg+Nom`
* *toiseen:* `toinen+A+Ord+Sg+Ill`
* *toista:* `toinen+A+Ord+Sg+Par`
* *toisten:* `toinen+A+Ord+Pl+Gen`
* *toisien:* `toinen+A+Ord+Pl+Gen`
* *toisia:* `toinen+A+Ord+Pl+Par`
* *toisiin:* `toinen+A+Ord+Pl+Ill`
* *toisena:* `toinen+A+Ord+Sg+Ess`
* *toisessa:* `toinen+A+Ord+Sg+Ine`
* *toisissa:* `toinen+A+Ord+Pl+Ine`
* *toisina:* `toinen+A+Ord+Pl+Ess`


*Numerals 45 examples:*
* *kolmas:* `kolmas+A+Ord+Sg+Nom`
* *kolmantena:* `kolmas+A+Ord+Sg+Ess`
* *kolmannessa:* `kolmas+A+Ord+Sg+Ine`
* *kolmanteen:* `kolmas+A+Ord+Sg+Ill`
* *kolmatta:* `kolmas+A+Ord+Sg+Par`
* *kolmansia:* `kolmas+A+Ord+Pl+Par`
* *kolmansien:* `kolmas+A+Ord+Pl+Gen`
* *kolmansissa:* `kolmas+A+Ord+Pl+Ine`
* *kolmansina:* `kolmas+A+Ord+Pl+Ess`


*Numerals 45 fron examples:*
* *neljäs:* `neljäs+A+Ord+Sg+Nom`
* *neljänteen:* `neljäs+A+Ord+Sg+Ill`
* *neljäntenä:* `neljäs+A+Ord+Sg+Ess`
* *neljännessä:* `neljäs+A+Ord+Sg+Ine`
* *neljättä:* `neljäs+A+Ord+Sg+Par`
* *neljänsiä:* `neljäs+A+Ord+Pl+Par`
* *neljänsien:* `neljäs+A+Ord+Pl+Gen`
* *neljänsiin:* `neljäs+A+Ord+Pl+Ill`
* *neljänsissä:* `neljäs+A+Ord+Pl+Ine`
* *neljänsinä:* `neljäs+A+Ord+Pl+Ess`
